Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.1A of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. The terms “gender transition procedures” and “health care


provider” have the same meaning as provided by Section 2607.1 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. “Public funds” means state funds from any source including,


but not limited to, appropriations, apportionments, or revenue


generated by state agencies through fines, fees, or any other means.


B. 1. Public funds shall not be directly or indirectly used,


granted, paid, or distributed to any entity, organization, health

Req. No. 1573 Page 1


care provider, or individual that provides or refers for gender


transition procedures.


2. A state employee found by the director or governing board,


as applicable, of his or her agency to have directly or indirectly


granted, paid, or distributed public funds to, or used public funds


on, any entity, organization, health care provider, or individual


that provides or refers for gender transition procedures shall, in


accordance with applicable state law, be subject to disciplinary


action which may include, but not be limited to, termination.


C. 1. Gender transition procedures shall not be provided or


referred for:


a. by or in a health care facility owned by the state or


a county or local government, or


b. by a health care provider employed by the state or a


county or local government.


2. A health care provider employed by a state agency or a


county or local government found by the appropriate authority of his


or her agency or political subdivision to have violated paragraph 1


of this subsection shall be subject to disciplinary action which may


include, but not be limited to, termination.


3. A health care provider employed by a state agency or county


or local government found to have violated paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable by a fine not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)

Req. No. 1573 Page 2


nor less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by imprisonment


in the county jail for a term not less than one (1) month nor more


than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1573 DC 1/16/2025 2:18:50 PM





























Req. No. 1573 Page 3